New York, session 2025-2026, A8488.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1180-h to read as follows: 3 § 1180-h. Owner liability for failure of operator to comply with 4 certain posted maximum speed limits; county of Oneida. (a) 1. Notwith- 5 standing any other provision of law, the county of Oneida is hereby 6 authorized to establish a demonstration program imposing monetary 7 liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof 8 to comply with posted maximum speed limits in a school speed zone within 9 such county (i) when a school speed limit is in effect as provided in 10 paragraphs one and two of subdivision (c) of section eleven hundred 11 eighty of this article or (ii) when other speed limits are in effect as 12 provided in subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred 13 eighty of this article during the following times: (A) on school days 14 during school hours and one hour before and one hour after the school 15 day, and (B) a period during student activities at the school and up to 16 thirty minutes immediately before and up to thirty minutes immediately 17 after such student activities. Such demonstration program shall empower 18 the county of Oneida to install photo speed violation monitoring systems 19 within no more than eight school speed zones within such county at any 20 one time and to operate such systems within such zones (iii) when a 21 school speed limit is in effect as provided in paragraphs one and two of 22 subdivision (c) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article or (iv) EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13147-04-5 A. 8488--A 2 1 when other speed limits are in effect as provided in subdivision (b), 2 (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article during 3 the following times: (A) on school days during school hours and one hour 4 before and one hour after the school day, and (B) a period during 5 student activities at the school and up to thirty minutes immediately 6 before and up to thirty minutes immediately after such student activ- 7 ities. Provided, however, that no photo speed violation monitoring 8 system shall be installed and operated by such county except on roadways 9 under the jurisdiction of such county. In selecting a school speed zone 10 in which to install and operate a photo speed violation monitoring 11 system, the county shall consider criteria including, but not limited 12 to, the speed data, crash history, and the roadway geometry applicable 13 to such school speed zone. 14 2. No photo speed violation monitoring system shall be used in a 15 school speed zone unless (i) on the day it is to be used it has success- 16 fully passed a self-test of its functions; and (ii) it has undergone an 17 annual calibration check performed pursuant to paragraph four of this 18 subdivision. The county shall install signs giving notice that a photo 19 speed violation monitoring system is in use to be mounted on advance 20 warning signs notifying motor vehicle operators of such upcoming school 21 speed zone and/or on speed limit signs applicable within such school 22 speed zone, in conformance with standards established in the MUTCD. 23 3. Operators of photo speed violation monitoring systems shall have 24 completed training in the procedures for setting up, testing, and oper- 25 ating such systems. Each such operator shall complete and sign a daily 26 set-up log for each such system that the operator operates that (i) 27 states the date and time when, and the location where, the system was 28 set up that day, and (ii) states that such operator successfully 29 performed, and the system passed, the self-tests of such system before 30 producing a recorded image that day. The county shall retain each such 31 daily log until the later of the date on which the photo speed violation 32 monitoring system to which it applies has been permanently removed from 33 use or the final resolution of all cases involving notices of liability 34 issued based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other 35 recorded images produced by such system. 36 4. Each photo speed violation monitoring system shall undergo an annu- 37 al calibration check performed by an independent calibration laboratory 38 which shall issue a signed certificate of calibration. The county shall 39 keep each such annual certificate of calibration on file until the final 40 resolution of all cases involving a notice of liability issued during 41 such year which were based on photographs, microphotographs, videotape 42 or other recorded images produced by such photo speed violation monitor- 43 ing system. 44 5. (i) Such demonstration program shall utilize necessary technologies 45 to ensure, to the extent practicable, that photographs, microphoto- 46 graphs, videotape or other recorded images produced by such photo speed 47 violation monitoring systems shall not include images that identify the 48 driver, the passengers, or the contents of the vehicle. Provided, 49 however, that no notice of liability issued pursuant to this section 50 shall be dismissed solely because such a photograph, microphotograph, 51 videotape or other recorded image allows for the identification of the 52 driver, the passengers, or the contents of vehicles where the county 53 shows that it made reasonable efforts to comply with the provisions of 54 this paragraph in such case. 55 (ii) Photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other recorded 56 image from a photo speed violation monitoring system shall be for the A. 8488--A 3 1 exclusive use of the county for the purpose of the adjudication of 2 liability imposed pursuant to this section and of the owner receiving a 3 notice of liability pursuant to this section, and shall be destroyed by 4 the county upon the final resolution of the notice of liability to which 5 such photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images 6 relate, or one year following the date of issuance of such notice of 7 liability, whichever is later. Notwithstanding the provisions of any 8 other law, rule or regulation to the contrary, photographs, microphoto- 9 graphs, videotape or any other recorded image from a photo speed 10 violation monitoring system shall not be open to the public, nor subject 11 to civil or criminal process or discovery, nor used by any court or 12 administrative or adjudicatory body in any action or proceeding therein 13 except that which is necessary for the adjudication of a notice of 14 liability issued pursuant to this section, and no public entity or 15 employee, officer or agent thereof shall disclose such information, 16 except that such photographs, microphotographs, videotape or any other 17 recorded images from such systems: 18 (A) shall be available for inspection and copying and use by the motor 19 vehicle owner and operator for so long as such photographs, microphoto- 20 graphs, videotape or other recorded images are required to be maintained 21 or are maintained by such public entity, employee, officer or agent; and 22 (B) (1) shall be furnished when described in a search warrant issued 23 by a court authorized to issue such a search warrant pursuant to article 24 six hundred ninety of the criminal procedure law or a federal court 25 authorized to issue such a search warrant under federal law, where such 26 search warrant states that there is reasonable cause to believe such 27 information constitutes evidence of, or tends to demonstrate that, a 28 misdemeanor or felony offense was committed in this state or another 29 state, or that a particular person participated in the commission of a 30 misdemeanor or felony offense in this state or another state, provided, 31 however, that if such offense was against the laws of another state, the 32 court shall only issue a warrant if the conduct comprising such offense 33 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony 34 against the laws of this state; and 35 (2) shall be furnished in response to a subpoena duces tecum signed by 36 a judge of competent jurisdiction and issued pursuant to article six 37 hundred ten of the criminal procedure law or a judge or magistrate of a 38 federal court authorized to issue such a subpoena duces tecum under 39 federal law, where the judge finds and the subpoena states that there is 40 reasonable cause to believe such information is relevant and material to 41 the prosecution, or the defense, or the investigation by an authorized 42 law enforcement official, of the alleged commission of a misdemeanor or 43 felony in this state or another state, provided, however, that if such 44 offense was against the laws of another state, such judge or magistrate 45 shall only issue such subpoena if the conduct comprising such offense 46 would, if occurring in this state, constitute a misdemeanor or felony in 47 this state; and 48 (3) may, if lawfully obtained pursuant to this clause and clause (A) 49 of this subparagraph and otherwise admissible, be used in such criminal 50 action or proceeding. 51 (b) If the county of Oneida establishes a demonstration program pursu- 52 ant to subdivision (a) of this section, the owner of a vehicle shall be 53 liable for a penalty imposed pursuant to this section if such vehicle 54 was used or operated with the permission of the owner, express or 55 implied, within a school speed zone in violation of subdivision (c) or 56 during the times authorized pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section A. 8488--A 4 1 in violation of subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven 2 hundred eighty of this article, such vehicle was traveling at a speed of 3 more than ten miles per hour above the posted speed limit in effect 4 within such school speed zone, and such violation is evidenced by infor- 5 mation obtained from a photo speed violation monitoring system; provided 6 however that no owner of a vehicle shall be liable for a penalty imposed 7 pursuant to this section where the operator of such vehicle has been 8 convicted of the underlying violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 9 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 10 (c) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the 11 following meanings: 12 1. "manual on uniform traffic control devices" or "MUTCD" shall mean 13 the manual and specifications for a uniform system of traffic control 14 devices maintained by the commissioner of transportation pursuant to 15 section sixteen hundred eighty of this chapter; 16 2. "owner" shall have the meaning provided in article two-B of this 17 chapter; 18 3. "photo speed violation monitoring system" shall mean a vehicle 19 sensor installed to work in conjunction with a speed measuring device 20 which automatically produces two or more photographs, two or more micro- 21 photographs, a videotape or other recorded images of each vehicle at the 22 time it is used or operated in a school speed zone in violation of 23 subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty 24 of this article in accordance with the provisions of this section; and 25 4. "school speed zone" shall mean a distance not to exceed one thou- 26 sand three hundred twenty feet on a highway passing a school building, 27 entrance or exit of a school abutting on the highway. 28 (d) A certificate, sworn to or affirmed by a technician employed by 29 the county of Oneida, or a facsimile thereof, based upon inspection of 30 photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded images 31 produced by a photo speed violation monitoring system, shall be prima 32 facie evidence of the facts contained therein. Any photographs, micro- 33 photographs, videotape or other recorded images evidencing such a 34 violation shall include at least two date and time stamped images of the 35 rear of the motor vehicle that include the same stationary object near 36 the motor vehicle and shall be available for inspection reasonably in 37 advance of and at any proceeding to adjudicate the liability for such 38 violation pursuant to this section. 39 (e) An owner liable for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 40 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to a 41 demonstration program established pursuant to this section shall be 42 liable for monetary penalties not to exceed fifty dollars for each 43 violation; provided, however, that an additional penalty not in excess 44 of twenty-five dollars for each violation may be imposed for the failure 45 to respond to a notice of liability within the prescribed time period. 46 (f) An imposition of liability under the demonstration program estab- 47 lished pursuant to this section shall not be deemed a conviction as an 48 operator and shall not be made part of the operating record of the 49 person upon whom such liability is imposed nor shall it be used for 50 insurance purposes in the provision of motor vehicle insurance coverage. 51 (g) 1. A notice of liability shall be sent by first class mail to each 52 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 53 (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this arti- 54 cle pursuant to this section, within fourteen business days if such 55 owner is a resident of this state and within forty-five business days if 56 such owner is a non-resident. Personal delivery on the owner shall not A. 8488--A 5 1 be required. A manual or automatic record of mailing prepared in the 2 ordinary course of business shall be prima facie evidence of the facts 3 contained therein. 4 2. A notice of liability shall contain the name and address of the 5 person alleged to be liable as an owner for a violation of subdivision 6 (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this arti- 7 cle pursuant to this section, the registration number of the vehicle 8 involved in such violation, the location where such violation took 9 place, the date and time of such violation, the identification number of 10 the camera which recorded the violation or other document locator 11 number, at least two date and time stamped images of the rear of the 12 motor vehicle that include the same stationary object near the motor 13 vehicle, and the certificate charging the liability. 14 3. The notice of liability shall contain information advising the 15 person charged of the manner and the time in which the person may 16 contest the liability alleged in the notice. Such notice of liability 17 shall also contain a prominent warning to advise the person charged that 18 failure to contest in the manner and time provided shall be deemed an 19 admission of liability and that a default judgment may be entered there- 20 on. 21 4. The notice of liability shall be prepared and mailed by the county 22 of Oneida, or by any other entity authorized by the county to prepare 23 and mail such notice of liability. 24 (h) Adjudication of the liability imposed upon owners by this section 25 shall be by a traffic violations bureau established pursuant to section 26 three hundred seventy of the general municipal law where the violation 27 occurred or, if there be none, by the court having jurisdiction over 28 traffic infractions. 29 (i) If an owner receives a notice of liability pursuant to this 30 section for any time period during which the vehicle or the number plate 31 or plates of such vehicle was reported to the police department as 32 having been stolen, it shall be a valid defense to an allegation of 33 liability for a violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 34 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this section 35 that the vehicle or the number plate or plates of such vehicle had been 36 reported to the police as stolen prior to the time the violation 37 occurred and had not been recovered by such time. For purposes of 38 asserting the defense provided by this subdivision, it shall be suffi- 39 cient that a certified copy of the police report on the stolen vehicle 40 or number plate or plates of such vehicle be sent by first class mail to 41 the traffic violations bureau or court having jurisdiction. 42 (j) An owner who is a lessor of a vehicle to which a notice of liabil- 43 ity was issued pursuant to subdivision (g) of this section shall not be 44 liable for the violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 45 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this section, 46 provided that such lessor sends to the traffic violations bureau or 47 court having jurisdiction a copy of the rental, lease or other such 48 contract document covering such vehicle on the date of the violation, 49 with the name and address of the lessee clearly legible, within thirty- 50 seven days after receiving notice from the bureau or court of the date 51 and time of such violation, together with the other information 52 contained in the original notice of liability. Failure to send such 53 information within such thirty-seven day time period shall render the 54 owner liable for the penalty prescribed by this section. Where the 55 lessor complies with the provisions of this subdivision, the lessee of 56 such vehicle on the date of such violation shall be deemed to be the A. 8488--A 6 1 owner of such vehicle for purposes of this section, shall be subject to 2 liability for the violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 3 section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this section 4 and shall be sent a notice of liability pursuant to subdivision (g) of 5 this section. 6 (k) 1. If the owner liable for a violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 7 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article pursuant to this 8 section was not the operator of the vehicle at the time of the 9 violation, the owner may maintain an action for indemnification against 10 the operator. 11 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no owner of a 12 vehicle shall be subject to a monetary fine imposed pursuant to this 13 section if the operator of such vehicle was operating such vehicle with- 14 out the consent of the owner at the time such operator operated such 15 vehicle in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section 16 eleven hundred eighty of this article. For purposes of this subdivision 17 there shall be a presumption that the operator of such vehicle was oper- 18 ating such vehicle with the consent of the owner at the time such opera- 19 tor operated such vehicle in violation of subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) 20 or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 21 (l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability 22 of an operator of a vehicle for any violation of subdivision (c) or (d) 23 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. 24 (m) If the county adopts a demonstration program pursuant to subdivi- 25 sion (a) of this section it shall conduct a study and submit an annual 26 report on the results of the use of photo devices to the governor, the 27 temporary president of the senate and the speaker of the assembly on or 28 before the first day of June next succeeding the effective date of this 29 section and on the same date in each succeeding year in which the demon- 30 stration program is operable. Such report shall include: 31 1. the locations where and dates when photo speed violation monitoring 32 systems were used; 33 2. the aggregate number, type and severity of crashes, fatalities, 34 injuries and property damage reported within all school speed zones 35 within the county, to the extent the information is maintained by the 36 department of motor vehicles of this state; 37 3. the aggregate number, type and severity of crashes, fatalities, 38 injuries and property damage reported within school speed zones where 39 photo speed violation monitoring systems were used, to the extent the 40 information is maintained by the department of motor vehicles of this 41 state; 42 4. the number of violations recorded within all school speed zones 43 within the county, in the aggregate on a daily, weekly and monthly 44 basis; 45 5. the number of violations recorded within each school speed zone 46 where a photo speed violation monitoring system is used, in the aggre- 47 gate on a daily, weekly and monthly basis; 48 6. the number of violations recorded within all school speed zones 49 within the county that were: 50 (i) more than ten but not more than twenty miles per hour over the 51 posted speed limit; 52 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 53 posted speed limit; 54 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 55 posted speed limit; and 56 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; A. 8488--A 7 1 7. the number of violations recorded within each school speed zone 2 where a photo speed violation monitoring system is used that were: 3 (i) more than ten but not more than twenty miles per hour over the 4 posted speed limit; 5 (ii) more than twenty but not more than thirty miles per hour over the 6 posted speed limit; 7 (iii) more than thirty but not more than forty miles per hour over the 8 posted speed limit; and 9 (iv) more than forty miles per hour over the posted speed limit; 10 8. the total number of notices of liability issued for violations 11 recorded by such systems; 12 9. the number of fines and total amount of fines paid after the first 13 notice of liability issued for violations recorded by such systems; 14 10. the number of violations adjudicated and the results of such adju- 15 dications including breakdowns of dispositions made for violations 16 recorded by such systems; 17 11. the total amount of revenue realized by the county in connection 18 with the program; 19 12. the expenses incurred by the county in connection with the 20 program; and 21 13. the quality of the adjudication process and its results. 22 (n) It shall be a defense to any prosecution for a violation of subdi- 23 vision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of section eleven hundred eighty of 24 this article pursuant to this section that such photo speed violation 25 monitoring system was malfunctioning at the time of the alleged 26 violation. 27 § 2. Section 1803 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding 28 a new subdivision 18 to read as follows: 29 18. Where the county of Oneida has established a demonstration program 30 imposing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an 31 operator thereof to comply with subdivision (b), (c), (d), (f) or (g) of 32 section eleven hundred eighty of this chapter in accordance with section 33 eleven hundred eighty-h of this chapter, any fine or penalty collected 34 by a court, judge, magistrate or other officer for an imposition of 35 liability which occurs within a town or village within such county 36 pursuant to such program shall be paid to the state comptroller within 37 the first ten days of the month following collection, except as other- 38 wise provided in subdivision three of section ninety-nine-a of the state 39 finance law. Every such payment shall be accompanied by a statement in 40 such form and detail as the comptroller shall provide. The comptroller 41 shall pay eighty percent of any such fine or penalty imposed for such 42 liability to the county of Oneida, and twenty percent of any such fine 43 or penalty to the town or village in which the violation giving rise to 44 the liability occurred. All fines, penalties and forfeitures paid to a 45 town or village pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision shall be 46 credited to the general fund of such town or village, unless a different 47 disposition is prescribed by charter, special law, local law or ordi- 48 nance. 49 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 87 of the public officers law is amended 50 by adding a new paragraph (v) to read as follows: 51 (v) are photographs, microphotographs, videotape or other recorded 52 images prepared under the authority of section eleven hundred eighty-h 53 of the vehicle and traffic law. 54 § 4. The purchase or lease of equipment for a demonstration program 55 established pursuant to section 1180-h of the vehicle and traffic law, A. 8488--A 8 1 as added by section one of this act, shall be subject to the provisions 2 of section 103 of the general municipal law. 3 § 5. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 4 have become a law and shall expire December 31, 2030, when upon such 5 date the provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. Effective 6 immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regu- 7 lation necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective 8 date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective 9 date.